Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1342.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.7(b), (d), (e) and (g) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 635.7. Billing.--* * *[(b) An insurer must reimburse a nonnetwork EMS agency under the following:(1) The EMS agency has submitted a completed standardized 12345678910111213141516171819202122 form to the department requesting nonnetwork direct reimbursement from an insurer an EMS agency has identified. The form must be submitted to the department annually by October 15. The form shall declare the EMS agency's intention to receive direct payment from an insurer identified on the form for the next calendar year. The department shall develop a standardized form, using an EMS agency's assigned license number, to be used by an EMS agency that meets the conditions established under this section. The department shall develop and maintain a publicly accessible electronic registry that indicates which EMS agency has requested nonnetwork direct reimbursement from an insurer identified on the form.(2) An EMS agency has provided notification to the insurer upon submitting a claim for reimbursement that the EMS agency is registered with the department to receive direct reimbursement as provided for under this section.](b.1) An EMS agency may seek reimbursement and shall accept payment from an insurer for services that have been provided to a covered person for dispatched 911 emergency medical services.(b.2) Upon receiving a bill for dispatched 911 emergency medical services, an insurer shall directly reimburse a designated EMS agency within forty-five days at three hundred fifty percent of the current published rate for ambulance services as established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XVIII (relating to health insurance for aged and disabled) for the same service provided in the same geographic area and according to:(1) The allowable amount afforded under this section only applies to dispatched 911 emergency medical services and does not apply to any other covered service provided by a 20260SB1342PN1737 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participating network provider under a health insurance policy.(2) Payment made by the insurer in compliance with this section shall be considered payment in full for the service provided, except for any copayment, coinsurance, deductible or other cost-sharing amounts required to be paid by the covered person.(3) An EMS agency may not bill the covered person directly or indirectly or otherwise attempt to collect from a covered person, except to recover a cost-sharing amount.(4) An insurer may not require an EMS agency to contract with the insurer to receive reimbursement under this section.* * *[(d) Where an insurer has reimbursed a nonnetwork EMS agency at the same rate it has established for a network EMS agency, the EMS agency may not bill the insured directly or indirectly or otherwise attempt to collect from the insured for the service provided, except for a billing to recover a copayment, coinsurance or deductible as specified in the health insurance policy.](e) An EMS agency [that submits a form under this section] may solicit donations or memberships or conduct fundraising, except that an EMS agency may not promise, suggest or infer to donors that a donation will result in the donor not being billed directly for any payment as provided under this section. Notwithstanding this paragraph, an EMS agency may bill in accordance with subsection [(d)] (b.2)(3). A violation of this section shall be considered a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the "Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law."* * *20260SB1342PN1737 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(g) This section shall apply only to an EMS agency that is a nonnetwork provider and provides emergency medical services, unless preempted by Federal law.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1342PN1737 - 4 - 12345